Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2738
Act; supplemental powers; how construed.

The powers conferred by the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and shall be independent of and in addition to any other provisions of the law of Nebraska, including the Community Development Law. The act and all grants of power, authority, rights, or discretion to a city under the act shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry the act into effect are hereby expressly granted to and conferred upon a city.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 15.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.